Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF420.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 273.11, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 24. new text end new text begin Residential valuation increase limitation. new text end new text begin (a) In determining the market value of residential property, a county assessor shall not increase the market value of residential property by more than three percent of the prior year's assessment value. new text end new text begin (b) When residential property is sold, the limitation in paragraph (a) shall not apply for the following assessment year. During a sale of residential property, a purchaser or an agent of a purchaser may request the county auditor provide a property tax estimate based off the current year's fair market value of the property. new text end new text begin (c) If the estimated market value of a sold residential property increases more than ....... percent over the prior year's assessment value, the county auditor shall spread the percent increase across the net tax capacity of all residential properties effective for taxes payable in the two years following the next taxes payable year. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for assessment year 2026 and thereafter. new text end